Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 17
JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE

2-3-1701. Definitions.

As used in this part 17, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Artificial intelligence" means systems that can:

Perceive an environment through data acquisition, process and interpret the derived information, and take actions or imitate intelligent behavior to achieve a specified goal; and

Learn from past behavior and results and adapt their behavior accordingly.

"Committee" means the joint technology committee created in section 2-3-1702.

"Cybersecurity" means a broad range of technologies, processes, and practices designed to protect networks, computers, programs, and data from attack, damage, or unauthorized access.

"Data privacy" means the collection and dissemination of data and technology and the public expectation of privacy. "Data privacy" also includes the way personally identifiable information or other sensitive information is collected, stored, used, and finally destroyed or deleted, in digital form or otherwise.

"Disproportionately impacted community" has the meaning set forth in section 24-4-109 (2)(b)(II).

"Facial recognition service" has the meaning set forth in section 24-18-301 (5).

"Information technology" means technology, infrastructure, equipment, systems, or software that controls, displays, switches, interchanges, transmits, and receives data or information, including audio, video, graphics, and text. "Information technology" shall be construed broadly to incorporate future technologies that change or supplant those in effect as of September 7, 2021.

"Information technology budget request" means a budget request from a state agency or state institution of higher education for the installation, development, maintenance, or upgrade of information technology, including the purchase of services from the office on the condition that the use of such services is the most cost beneficial option or falls within the duties and responsibilities of the office or the office's chief information officer as described in sections 24-37.5-105 and 24-37.5-106. "Information technology budget request" does not include budget requests that are primarily operational in nature or a budget request where the majority of funding will be used to support or modify state staffing levels.

"Office of information technology" or "office" means the office of information technology created in section 24-37.5-103.

"Oversee" means reviews of major information technology projects as defined in section 24-37.5-102 (19), reviews of the office's budget requests for information technology projects, and ensuring that information technology projects follow best practice standards as established by the office. "Oversee" does not include interference with the office's general responsibilities set forth in this article 3.

"State agency" means all of the departments, divisions, commissions, boards, bureaus, and institutions in the executive branch of the state government. "State agency" does not include the legislative or judicial department, the department of law, the department of state, the department of the treasury, or state-supported institutions of higher education, including the Auraria higher education center established in article 70 of title 23.

"Task force" means the task force for the consideration of facial recognition services created in section 2-3-1707.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1187, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2014:

(2.5) added and (2.5)(b) amended, (HB 14-1395), ch. 309, pp. 1304, 1309, §§ 1, 9, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(1.3) and (1.7) added and (4) amended, (SB 17-304), ch. 252, p. 1054, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(2), (2.5), and (4) amended, (HB 21-1236), ch. 211, p. 1093, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-113), ch. 463, p. 3282, § 3, effective August 10.

2-3-1702. Joint technology committee established.

There is hereby established a joint committee of the senate and house of representatives known as the joint technology committee, consisting of three members of the house of representatives, two of whom are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one of whom is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives, and three members of the senate, two of whom are appointed by the president of the senate and one of whom is appointed by the minority leader of the senate. The members of the committee should have experience in information technology, business analysis, or business process. The committee functions during the legislative sessions and during the interim between sessions.

To expedite the work of the committee, appointees may be designated after the general election and prior to the convening of the general assembly at which such committee is to serve, whether such appointees are members of the then-current general assembly or members-elect of the next general assembly, or both; and such appointees have all the powers and duties and are entitled to the same compensation and expense allowance as members duly appointed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

The committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair, one from the senate membership of the committee and one from the house membership of the committee. The chair so elected shall serve as chair for the first regular session of the general assembly at which the committee is to serve, and as vice-chair for the second regular session; the vice-chair so elected shall serve as chair for the second regular session of said general assembly.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1188, § 1, effective May 18.

2-3-1703. Organization, procedures, and meetings.

The committee may prescribe its own rules of procedure and shall meet at least once each year in order to review the governor's budget submissions for information technology, and shall meet as often as necessary to perform its functions.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1189, § 1, effective May 18.

2-3-1704. Powers and duties of the joint technology committee - repeal.

The committee oversees the office of information technology, including but not limited to:

A review of the state of information technology;

Any general information technology needs;

Any anticipated short-term or long-term changes for information technology;

Repealed.

The office of information technology's responsibilities related to the geographic information system as set forth in section 24-37.5-103 (4).

The committee oversees the chief information security officer and his or her duties as established in part 4 of article 37.5 of title 24, C.R.S.

The committee oversees any telecommunications coordination within state government that the chief information officer performs pursuant to part 5 of article 37.5 of title 24, C.R.S.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Repealed.

The committee may review the actions of the statewide internet portal authority created in section 24-37.7-102, C.R.S.

The committee oversees a state agency regarding any authority that has been delegated to the state agency pursuant to section 24-37.5-105.4.

On or before November 1, 2021, and on November 1 of each year thereafter, the office of information technology shall submit a written report to the committee regarding any delegation of authority to the state agency pursuant to section 24-37.5-105.4. The report shall include a summary of the information included in the written delegation agreement between the state agency and the office of information technology pursuant to section 24-37.5-105.4 (3).

(6.5) The committee may request information and presentations from state agencies regarding data privacy and cybersecurity within state agencies and may coordinate with the Colorado cybersecurity council created in section 24-33.5-1902. In addition, the committee may consider:

Whether state agencies are collecting or retaining data that exceeds what is necessary and appropriate for such agencies to perform their functions;

Who has access to data, the extent of such access, and appropriate mechanisms to protect sensitive data; and

Measures to protect data against unauthorized access, disclosure, use, modification, or destruction.

On or before November 1, 2013, and on November 1 of each year thereafter, the judicial department, the department of law, the department of state, and the department of the treasury shall submit a written report to the committee that details all information technology that such department purchased or implemented.

A copy of any legislative measure introduced during any legislative session, regular or special, commencing on or after January 1, 2014, and determined by the speaker of the house of representatives or by the president of the senate to be dealing with information technology, data privacy, or cybersecurity shall be reviewed by the committee. The committee may also request that any legislative measure introduced during a legislative session, regular or special, and determined by the committee to be dealing with information technology, data privacy, or cybersecurity be reviewed by the committee. The committee may make advisory recommendations about such legislative measures to the house of representatives, the senate, the joint budget committee, the capital development committee, or to any committee of reference, as appropriate, considering any such legislative measure.

On or before the first day of the regular legislative session commencing on or after January 1, 2014, and on the first day of each regular legislative session thereafter, the joint technology committee shall submit a written report on the committee's findings and recommendations based on the committee's oversight pursuant to subsections (1) to (8) of this section to the joint budget committee. Such report may include:

Legislation recommended by the committee that addresses any of the committee's findings and recommendations based on the committee's oversight pursuant to subsections (1) to (8) of this section. Any such legislation is exempt from the five-bill limitation specified in rule 24 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives; and

A report on the status of any information technology budget request that was previously approved for phasing in or for incremental implementation over a period exceeding one year.

Upon request, a state agency and the judicial department, the department of law, the department of state, and the department of the treasury shall make available to the committee such data, reports, or information as are necessary for the performance of the committee's duties. If the committee requests such data, reports, or information, the state agency or judicial department, the department of law, the department of state, or the department of the treasury shall provide the requested information no later than November 1 of the calendar year in which the request is made.

The committee shall study all information technology budget requests pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, made by all state agencies and state institutions of higher education. For purposes of institutions of higher education, the committee shall only review state-funded information technology budget requests. The committee shall make determinations of the priority to be accorded to such information technology budget requests based upon information made available to the committee from any sources with respect to estimates of revenues available in a fiscal year for information technology budget requests. The committee shall make written reports setting forth its recommendations, prioritization, findings, and comments as to each information technology budget request reviewed pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives, including recommendations regarding the appropriate amount of an information technology budget request, and shall submit such written reports to the joint budget committee for supplemental information technology budget requests no later than January 15 of each year, and for new or amended information technology budget requests for the upcoming fiscal year no later than February 15 of each year.

The joint budget committee may seek the committee's review of any operating budget request for information technology.

The committee shall hold such hearings as may be necessary to study all information technology budget requests pursuant to rule 45 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives made by all state agencies and state institutions of higher education.

The legislative council staff shall assist and advise the committee by reviewing and summarizing the information technology budget requests made by all state agencies and state institutions of higher education.

The committee shall oversee information technology strategy through the review of state agency information technology plans.

Between adjournment sine die of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly and the first meeting in 2021 of the sales and use tax simplification task force created in section 39-26-802, the committee shall:

Seek regular updates from the office of information technology and the department of revenue regarding the development of the electronic sales and use tax simplification system described in Senate Bill 19-006, enacted in 2019;

Once the electronic sales and use tax simplification system described in Senate Bill 19-006, enacted in 2019, is online, monitor and encourage participation by businesses and home rule municipalities; and

Seek regular updates from the office of information technology and the department of revenue regarding the purchase and development of a geographic information system (GIS) database to maintain jurisdictional boundaries of sales tax districts and to calculate appropriate sales and use tax rates for individual addresses for which the department of revenue received an appropriation in Senate Bill 19-006, enacted in 2019.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1189, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2014:

(9), (11)(a), and (11)(c) amended and (11) added, (HB 14-1395), ch. 309, pp. 1305, 1309, §§ 2, 10, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(6.5) added and (8) amended, (SB 17-304), ch. 252, p. 1054, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(12) added, (HB 20-1022), ch. 156, p. 671, § 4, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) and (4) repealed and (1)(e), (6), (7), and (11)(e) amended, (HB 21-1236), ch. 211, p. 1094, § 2, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(3) repealed, (HB 22-1353), ch. 479, p. 3488, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1353, see section 1 of chapter 479, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

2-3-1705. Staff assistance.

The legislative council staff and the office of legislative legal services shall assist the joint technology committee in carrying out its duties.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1191, § 1, effective May 18.

2-3-1706. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1079), ch. 246, p. 1191, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (SB 17-304), ch. 252, p. 1055, § 3, effective August 9.

2-3-1707. Task force for the consideration of facial recognition services - creation - membership - duties - compensation - staff support - repeal.

Creation - membership.

There is created a task force for the consideration of facial recognition services. The task force consists of the following fifteen members:

The chief information officer appointed by the governor pursuant to section 24-37.5-103 (1) or the chief information officer's designee;

The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;

The director of the Colorado bureau of investigation created in section 24-33.5-401 or the director's designee;

One member who represents the Colorado district attorneys' council, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

One member who represents either the county sheriffs of Colorado or the Colorado association of chiefs of police, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who is a state representative, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

One member who is a state senator, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who represents local school district boards of education, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

One member who is an instructor at an institution of higher education and has expert knowledge of, and experience with, facial recognition services technology, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who is a business professional with expert knowledge of, and experience with, facial recognition services products, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

One member who is an attorney with expert knowledge of, and experience with, federal and state laws concerning facial recognition services, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who represents the Colorado criminal defense bar, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who represents a consumer protection association, to be appointed by the president of the senate;

One member who represents a statewide civil liberties organization, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

One member who represents disproportionately impacted communities, to be appointed by the president of the senate.

The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall make each of the initial appointments described in subsection (1)(a) of this section not later than sixty days after August 10, 2022.

The terms of the appointed members of the task force are as follows:

The state representative appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(VI) of this section may serve indefinitely, at the discretion of the speaker of the house of representatives, so long as the person remains a state representative;

The state senator appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(VII) of this section may serve indefinitely, at the discretion of the president of the senate, so long as the person remains a state senator;

The initial terms of the members appointed pursuant to subsections (1)(a)(IV), (1)(a)(V), (1)(a)(VIII), (1)(a)(IX), and (1)(a)(X) of this section are two years, and thereafter the terms of such members are four years; and

The members appointed pursuant to subsections (1)(a)(XI) to (1)(a)(XV) of this section shall serve terms of four years.

Any vacancy that occurs among the appointed members of the task force shall be filled by the appropriate appointing authority as soon as practicable in accordance with the limitations specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

In making appointments to the task force, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall ensure that the membership of the task force:

Reflects the ethnic, cultural, and gender diversity of the state;

Includes representation of all areas of the state, including persons who do not reside in the front range region of the state; and

To the extent practicable, includes persons with disabilities.

Not later than ninety days after August 10, 2022, the president of the senate shall appoint a member of the task force to serve as the initial chair of the task force. Thereafter, the chair of the task force shall be appointed annually on or before July 1, with the speaker of the house of representatives appointing the chair in odd-numbered years and the president of the senate appointing the chair in even-numbered years.

Issues for study. The task force shall examine and, pursuant to subsection (3)(e) of this section, report to the committee concerning the extent to which state and local government agencies are currently using facial recognition services and provide recommendations concerning the extent to which state and local government agencies should be permitted to use facial recognition services, including consideration of:

Regulation, approval, and procurement of facial recognition services;

Access to data collected by facial recognition services;

Education of the public concerning facial recognition services, including in public schools and institutions of higher education;

Ethical considerations relating to the use of facial recognition services;

Transparency and disclosure requirements concerning how state and local government agencies use facial recognition services;

The potential abuses and threats posed to civil liberties, freedoms, privacy, and security by the use of facial recognition services;

The potential impact of the use of facial recognition services on vulnerable communities; and

How to facilitate and encourage the continued development of facial recognition services so that individuals, businesses, governments, and other institutions can benefit from their use while safeguarding against potential abuses and threats.

Additional duties of the task force. The task force shall:

Meet on or before December 1, 2022, at a time and place to be determined by the chair of the task force;

Meet at least once every four months, or more often as directed by the chair of the committee;

Communicate with and obtain input from groups throughout the state affected by the issues identified in subsection (2) of this section;

Create subcommittees as needed to carry out the duties of the task force. The subcommittees may consist, in part, of persons who are not members of the task force. Such persons may vote on issues before the subcommittee but are not entitled to vote at meetings of the task force.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), submit a report to the committee on or before October 1, 2023, and on or before each October 1 thereafter, that, at a minimum:

Describes issues to be studied in upcoming task force meetings and a prioritization of those issues;

Describes findings and recommendations regarding issues considered by the task force;

Describes legislative proposals that identify the policy issues involved, the agencies responsible for the implementation of the changes, and the funding sources required for implementation;

Includes recommendations concerning:

The requirements and restrictions described in part 3 of article 18 of title 24; and

The prohibitions and exceptions described in sections 22-30.5-529 and 22-32-150; and

Includes a recommendation as to whether the scope of the issues for study by the task force, as described in subsection (2) of this section, should be expanded to include consideration of artificial intelligence other than facial recognition services, or even artificial intelligence itself, and, if so, whether the membership of the task force should be adjusted accordingly.

Compensation. Nonlegislative members of the task force and nonlegislative members of any subcommittees of the task force serve without compensation. Compensation of legislative members is paid from appropriations to the general assembly.

Staff support. The director of research of the legislative council may supply staff assistance to the task force as the director of research deems appropriate, subject to available appropriations. The task force may also accept donations of in-kind services for staff support from the private sector.

Repeal. This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027. Prior to the repeal, the task force is scheduled for review in accordance with section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-113), ch. 463, p. 3278, § 1, effective August 10.